Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-172
Bill of sale,
defined.

Bill of sale means a formal instrument
for the conveyance or transfer of title to livestock or other goods and chattels.
The bill of sale shall state the purchaser's name and address,
the date of transfer, the guarantee of title, the number of livestock transferred,
the sex of such livestock, the brand or brands, the location of the brand
or brands or a statement to the effect that the animal is unbranded, and the
name and address of the seller. The signature of the seller shall be attested
by at least one witness or acknowledged by a notary public or by some other
officer authorized by state law to take acknowledgments. For any conveyance or transfer of title to cattle subject
to assessment imposed pursuant to the federal Beef Promotion and Research
Order, 7 C.F.R. part 1260, for which the purchaser is the collecting person
pursuant to 7 C.F.R. 1260.311 for purposes of collecting and remitting such
assessment, the bill of sale shall include a notation of the amount the purchaser
collected from the seller or deducted from the sale proceeds for the assessment. A
properly executed bill of sale means a bill of sale that is provided by the
seller and received by the purchaser.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB768, § 3.
July 18, 2014